Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,185
License; revocation; when points disregarded.

When the operator's license of a person is revoked for a period of at least six months pursuant to an order of conviction or as provided by sections 60-4,182 to 60-4,186, points accumulated by reason of the conviction containing such order of revocation, or the conviction bringing the total number of points charged to such person to twelve or more, and all prior points accumulated, shall be disregarded so far as any subsequent revocation is concerned.

Laws 1953, c. 219, § 5, p. 771;

R.R.S.1943, § 39-7,132;

Laws 1975, LB 263, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.29;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 83;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 39.

In construing sections 39-669.26 to 39-669.30 (transferred to sections 60-4,182 to 60-4,186) together, the points which are to be disregarded for purposes of subsequent revocation under this section are those points for which a conviction had been had prior to the first revocation. Conkel v. Higgins, 1 Neb. App. 676, 511 N.W.2d 147 (1993).